CS/SpellingDictionaryExample/Dictionaries/ISpell/es_ES/espanol.aff
    I R		> -IR, íDSELA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDSELE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDSELOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDSELAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDSELES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íOSLOS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íOSLAS		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íOSLES		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDNOSLO		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDNOSLA		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDNOSLE		# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDNOSLOS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDNOSLAS	# comer > comerse
    I R		> -IR, íDNOSLES	# comer > comerse
